vi: Loại mặt bảng bật nảy: Có thể điều chỉnh; Nghiêng; Phẳng; Nhiều mặt/3D; Dốc; Khác
de: Oberflächenart des Rückprallbretts: Verstellbar; Abgewinkelt; Flach; Mehrflächig/3D; Geneigt; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície de rebote: Ajustável; Angulado; Plano; Multiface/3D; Inclinado; Outro
ru: Тип поверхности доски для отскока: Регулируемая; Наклонная; Плоская; Многогранная/3D; Скошенная; Другое
en: Rebound board face type: Adjustable; Angled; Flat; Multi-face/3D; Sloped; Other
fi: Palautusseinän lyöntipinnan tyyppi: Säädettävä; Kulmikas; Tasainen; Monipintainen/3D; Kalteva; Muu
es: Tipo de cara del tablero de rebote: Ajustable; En ángulo; Plano; Multifaz/3D; Inclinado; Otro
hu: Visszapattanó deszka felületének típusa: Állítható; Döntött; Lapos; Többoldalú/3D; Lejtős; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип лицева страна на дъската за отскок: Регулируем; Под ъгъл; Плосък; Многолицев/3D; Наклонен; Други
lt-LT: Atšokimo lentos paviršiaus tipas: Reguliuojama; Kampinė; Plokščia; Kelių plokštumų / 3D; Nuožulni; Kita
th: ประเภทของพื้นผิวแผ่นกระดานเด้งกลับ: ปรับได้; ทำมุม; เรียบ; หลายหน้า/3 มิติ; ลาดเอียง; อื่นๆ
nb: Returbrettets ansiktstype: Justerbar; Vinklet; Flat; Flere flater / 3D; Skrånende; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul suprafeței panoului de revenire: Reglabilă; Înclinată; Plată; Cu fețe multiple/3D; În pantă; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta udarne strani odbojne deske: Prilagodljivo; Pod kotom; Plosko; Večploskovno/3D; Nagnjeno; Drugo
pl: Typ powierzchni rebound boardu: Regulowana; Kątowa; Płaska; Wielopłaszczyznowa/3D; Pochyła; Inne
da: Pladens overflades tilbagestødstype: Justerbar; Vinklet; Flad; Flere overflader/3D; Skrånende; Andet
ko: 리바운드 보드 표면 유형: 조절형; 각진 형태; 평면; 다중면/3D; 경사면; 기타
el: Τύπος επιφάνειας ταμπλό αναπήδησης: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Υπό γωνία; Επίπεδη; Πολλαπλών όψεων/3D; Κεκλιμένη; Άλλο
it: Tipo di superficie del tabellone di rimbalzo: Regolabile; Angolata; Piatta; Multifaccia/3D; Inclinata; Altro
cs: Typ odrazové plochy desky: Nastavitelné; Nakloněné; Ploché; Víceplošné/3D; Šikmé; Ostatní
zh-CN: 回弹板面类型: 可调节; 成角度; 平坦; 多面/3D; 倾斜; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta površine odskočne ploče: Podesivo; Pod kutom; Ravno; Više lica / 3D; Nakošeno; Ostalo
tr: Geri tepme tahtası yüzey tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Açılı; Düz; Çok yüzlü/3B; Eğimli; Diğer
pt-BR: Rebote prancha face tipo: Ajustável; Inclinada; Plana; Multiface/3D; Inclinada; Outra
sk-SK: Typ čelnej plochy odrazovej dosky: Nastaviteľná; Uhlová; Plochá; Viacstranná/3D; Šikmá; Iné
fr: Type de face du panneau de rebond: Réglable; Incliné; Plat; Multi-faces/3D; En pente; Autre
nl: Reboundboard oppervlaktype: Verstelbaar; Gehoekt; Vlak; Meerdere vlakken/3D; Schuin; Overig
zh-TW: 反彈板表面類型: 可調式; 傾斜式; 平面式; 多面式/3D; 斜面式; 其他
ja: リバウンドボード面タイプ: 調整可能; 角度付き; フラット; マルチフェイス/3D; 傾斜付き; その他
sv: Reboundbrädans yta: Justerbar; Vinklad; Platt; Flerkantig/3D; Sluttande; Övrigt